src/fst/test/dict-gt-yamls/for_liv_yaml_2023_08_17_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
  Verb - äʼbțõ: # Verb 54 'eng /est aidata/fin' - full paradigm
    mis+Pron+Interr+Sg+Nom: mis
    mis+Pron+Interr+Sg+Gen: mis
    mis+Pron+Interr+Sg+Dat: missõn
    mis+Pron+Interr+Sg+Par: [midā, mis]
    mis+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ins: missõks
    mis+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ill: missõ
    mis+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ine: missõs
    mis+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ela: missõst
    
#"V_2":{"tips":"2","vards":"tǭʼdõ","vcount":"1","bloks":"V","loc":{
    tōdõ+V+Inf: tǭʼdõ
    tōdõ+V+Ger: tǭʼdsõ
    tōdõ+V+Sup: tǭʼmõ
    tōdõ+V+Deb: tǭʼmõst
    tōdõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tǭʼb
    tōdõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: tǭʼd
    tōdõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tǭʼb
    tōdõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: tǭʼmõ
    tōdõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: tǭʼtõ
    tōdõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: tǭʼbõd
    tōdõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: tǭʼž
    tōdõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: tǭʼžt
    tōdõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: tǭʼž
    tōdõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: tǭʼžmõ
    tōdõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: tǭʼžtõ
    tōdõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: tǭʼžtõ
    tōdõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: tǭʼ
    tōdõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Pl1: tǭʼmõ
    tōdõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Pl2: tǭʼtõ
    tōdõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Pl3: tǭʼtõ
    tōdõ+V+Cond+Sg1: tǭʼks
    tōdõ+V+Cond+Sg2: tǭʼkst
    tōdõ+V+Cond+Sg3: tǭʼks
    tōdõ+V+Cond+Pl1: tǭʼksmõ
    tōdõ+V+Cond+Pl2: tǭʼkstõ
    tōdõ+V+Cond+Pl3: tǭʼkstõ
    tōdõ+V+Cond+ConNeg+Sg: tǭʼks
    tōdõ+V+Cond+ConNeg+Pl1: tǭʼksmõ
    tōdõ+V+Cond+ConNeg+Pl2: tǭʼkstõ
    tōdõ+V+Cond+ConNeg+Pl3: tǭʼkstõ
    tōdõ+V+Imprt+Sg2: tǭʼ
    tōdõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: tǭʼ
    tōdõ+V+Imprt+Pl2: tǭʼgid
    tōdõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl2: tǭʼgid
    tōdõ+V+Jus+Sg3: tǭʼgõ
    tōdõ+V+Jus+ConNeg+Sg3: tǭʼgõ
    tōdõ+V+Jus+Pl3: tǭʼgõd
    tōdõ+V+Jus+ConNeg+Pl3: tǭʼgõd
    tōdõ+V+Quo+Sg3: tǭʼji
    tōdõ+V+Quo+ConNeg+Sg3: tǭʼji
    tōdõ+V+Quo+Pl3: tǭʼjid
    tōdõ+V+Quo+ConNeg+Pl3: tǭʼjid
    tōdõ+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg: tǭʼnd
    tōdõ+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl: tǭʼnõd
    tōdõ+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg: tǭʼdõd
    tōdõ+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg: tǭʼdõb
    tōdõ+V+Der+Der/NomAg+N+Sg+Nom: tǭʼji
    tōdõ+V+Der+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Nom: tǭʼmi
    
#"V_3":{"tips":"3","vards":"vīdõ","vcount":"5","bloks":"V","loc":{
    vīdõ+V+Inf: vīdõ
    vīdõ+V+Ger: vīdsõ
    vīdõ+V+Sup: vīmõ
    vīdõ+V+Deb: vīmõst
    vīdõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vīb
    vīdõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: vīd
    vīdõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vīb
    vīdõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: vīmõ
    vīdõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: vītõ
    vīdõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: vībõd
    vīdõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: vīž
    vīdõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: vīžt
    vīdõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: vīž
    vīdõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: vīžmõ
    vīdõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: vīžtõ
    vīdõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: vīžtõ
    vīdõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: vī
    vīdõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Pl1: vīmõ
    vīdõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Pl2: vītõ
    vīdõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Pl3: vītõ
    vīdõ+V+Cond+Sg1: vīks
    vīdõ+V+Cond+Sg2: vīkst
    vīdõ+V+Cond+Sg3: vīks
    vīdõ+V+Cond+Pl1: vīksmõ
    vīdõ+V+Cond+Pl2: vīkstõ
    vīdõ+V+Cond+Pl3: vīkstõ
    vīdõ+V+Cond+ConNeg+Sg: vīks
    vīdõ+V+Cond+ConNeg+Pl1: vīksmõ
    vīdõ+V+Cond+ConNeg+Pl2: vīkstõ
    vīdõ+V+Cond+ConNeg+Pl3: vīkstõ
    vīdõ+V+Imprt+Sg2: vī
    vīdõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: vī
    vīdõ+V+Imprt+Pl2: vīgid
    vīdõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl2: vīgid
    vīdõ+V+Jus+Sg3: vīgõ
    vīdõ+V+Jus+ConNeg+Sg3: vīgõ
    vīdõ+V+Jus+Pl3: vīgõd
    vīdõ+V+Jus+ConNeg+Pl3: vīgõd
    vīdõ+V+Quo+Sg3: vīji
    vīdõ+V+Quo+ConNeg+Sg3: vīji
    vīdõ+V+Quo+Pl3: vījid
    vīdõ+V+Quo+ConNeg+Pl3: vījid
    vīdõ+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg: vīnd
    vīdõ+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl: vīnõd
    vīdõ+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg: vīdõd
    vīdõ+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg: vīdõb
    vīdõ+V+Der+Der/NomAg+N+Sg+Nom: vīji
    vīdõ+V+Der+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Nom: vīmi
    
#"V_4":{"tips":"4","vards":"nǟʼdõ","vcount":"1","bloks":"V","loc":{
    nǟdõ+V+Inf: nǟʼdõ
    nǟdõ+V+Ger: nǟʼdsõ
    nǟdõ+V+Sup: nǟmõ
    nǟdõ+V+Deb: nǟmõst
    nǟdõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nǟb
    nǟdõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: nǟd
    nǟdõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nǟb
    nǟdõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: nǟmõ
    nǟdõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: nǟtõ
    nǟdõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: nǟbõd
    nǟdõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: neiz
    nǟdõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: neizt
    nǟdõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: neiz
    nǟdõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: neizmõ
    nǟdõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: neiztõ
    nǟdõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: neiztõ
    nǟdõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: nǟ
    nǟdõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Pl1: nǟmõ
    nǟdõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Pl2: nǟtõ
    nǟdõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Pl3: nǟtõ
    nǟdõ+V+Cond+Sg1: nǟks
    nǟdõ+V+Cond+Sg2: nǟkst
    nǟdõ+V+Cond+Sg3: nǟks
    nǟdõ+V+Cond+Pl1: nǟksmõ
    nǟdõ+V+Cond+Pl2: nǟkstõ
    nǟdõ+V+Cond+Pl3: nǟkstõ
    nǟdõ+V+Cond+ConNeg+Sg: nǟks
    nǟdõ+V+Cond+ConNeg+Pl1: nǟksmõ
    nǟdõ+V+Cond+ConNeg+Pl2: nǟkstõ
    nǟdõ+V+Cond+ConNeg+Pl3: nǟkstõ
    nǟdõ+V+Imprt+Sg2: nǟ
    nǟdõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: nǟ
    nǟdõ+V+Imprt+Pl2: nǟgid
    nǟdõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl2: nǟgid
    nǟdõ+V+Jus+Sg3: nǟgõ
    nǟdõ+V+Jus+ConNeg+Sg3: nǟgõ
    nǟdõ+V+Jus+Pl3: nǟgõd
    nǟdõ+V+Jus+ConNeg+Pl3: nǟgõd
    nǟdõ+V+Quo+Sg3: nēji
    nǟdõ+V+Quo+ConNeg+Sg3: nēji
    nǟdõ+V+Quo+Pl3: nējid
    nǟdõ+V+Quo+ConNeg+Pl3: nējid
    nǟdõ+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg: nǟnd
    nǟdõ+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl: nǟnõd
    nǟdõ+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg: nǟʼdõd
    nǟdõ+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg: nǟʼdõb
    nǟdõ+V+Der+Der/NomAg+N+Sg+Nom: nēji
    nǟdõ+V+Der+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Nom: nēmi
    
#"V_5":{"tips":"5","vards":"kǟʼdõ","vcount":"1","bloks":"V","loc":{
    kǟdõ+V+Inf: kǟʼdõ
    kǟdõ+V+Ger: kǟʼdsõ
    kǟdõ+V+Sup: kǟʼmõ
    kǟdõ+V+Deb: kǟʼmõst
    kǟdõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kǟʼb
    kǟdõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: kǟʼd
    kǟdõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kǟʼb
    kǟdõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: kǟʼmõ
    kǟdõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: kǟʼtõ
    kǟdõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: kǟʼbõd
    kǟdõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: keʼi
    kǟdõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: keʼid
    kǟdõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: keʼi
    kǟdõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: keʼimõ
    kǟdõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: keʼitõ
    kǟdõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: keʼitõ
    kǟdõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: kǟʼ
    kǟdõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Pl1: kǟʼmõ
    kǟdõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Pl2: kǟʼtõ
    kǟdõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Pl3: kǟʼtõ
    kǟdõ+V+Cond+Sg1: kǟʼks
    kǟdõ+V+Cond+Sg2: kǟʼkst
    kǟdõ+V+Cond+Sg3: kǟʼks
    kǟdõ+V+Cond+Pl1: kǟʼksmõ
    kǟdõ+V+Cond+Pl2: kǟʼkstõ
    kǟdõ+V+Cond+Pl3: kǟʼkstõ
    kǟdõ+V+Cond+ConNeg+Sg: kǟʼks
    kǟdõ+V+Cond+ConNeg+Pl1: kǟʼksmõ
    kǟdõ+V+Cond+ConNeg+Pl2: kǟʼkstõ
    kǟdõ+V+Cond+ConNeg+Pl3: kǟʼkstõ
    kǟdõ+V+Imprt+Sg2: kǟʼ
    kǟdõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: kǟʼ
    kǟdõ+V+Imprt+Pl2: kǟʼgid
    kǟdõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl2: kǟʼgid
    kǟdõ+V+Jus+Sg3: kǟʼgõ
    kǟdõ+V+Jus+ConNeg+Sg3: kǟʼgõ
    kǟdõ+V+Jus+Pl3: kǟʼgõd
    kǟdõ+V+Jus+ConNeg+Pl3: kǟʼgõd
    kǟdõ+V+Quo+Sg3: kēʼji
    kǟdõ+V+Quo+ConNeg+Sg3: kēʼji
    kǟdõ+V+Quo+Pl3: kēʼjid
    kǟdõ+V+Quo+ConNeg+Pl3: kēʼjid
    kǟdõ+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg: kǟʼnd
    kǟdõ+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl: kǟʼnõd
    kǟdõ+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg: kǟʼdõd
    kǟdõ+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg: kǟʼdõb
    kǟdõ+V+Der+Der/NomAg+N+Sg+Nom: kēʼji
    kǟdõ+V+Der+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Nom: kēʼmi
    
#"V_6":{"tips":"6","vards":"tīʼedõ","vcount":"2","bloks":"V","loc":{
    tīedõ+V+Inf: tīʼedõ
    tīedõ+V+Ger: tīʼedsõ
    tīedõ+V+Sup: tīʼemõ
    tīedõ+V+Deb: tīʼemõst
    tīedõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tīʼeb
    tīedõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: tīʼed
    tīedõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tīʼeb
    tīedõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: tīʼemõ
    tīedõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: tīʼetõ
    tīedõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: tīʼebõd
    tīedõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: tei
    tīedõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: teid
    tīedõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: tei
    tīedõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: teimõ
    tīedõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: teitõ
    tīedõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: teitõ
    tīedõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: tīʼe
    tīedõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Pl1: tīʼemõ
    tīedõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Pl2: tīʼetõ
    tīedõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Pl3: tīʼetõ
    tīedõ+V+Cond+Sg1: tīʼeks
    tīedõ+V+Cond+Sg2: tīʼekst
    tīedõ+V+Cond+Sg3: tīʼeks
    tīedõ+V+Cond+Pl1: tīʼeksmõ
    tīedõ+V+Cond+Pl2: tīʼekstõ
    tīedõ+V+Cond+Pl3: tīʼekstõ
    tīedõ+V+Cond+ConNeg+Sg: tīʼeks
    tīedõ+V+Cond+ConNeg+Pl1: tīʼeksmõ
    tīedõ+V+Cond+ConNeg+Pl2: tīʼekstõ
    tīedõ+V+Cond+ConNeg+Pl3: tīʼekstõ
    tīedõ+V+Imprt+Sg2: tīʼe
    tīedõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: tīʼe
    tīedõ+V+Imprt+Pl2: tīʼegid
    tīedõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl2: tīʼegid
    tīedõ+V+Jus+Sg3: tīʼegõ
    tīedõ+V+Jus+ConNeg+Sg3: tīʼegõ
    tīedõ+V+Jus+Pl3: tīʼegõd
    tīedõ+V+Jus+ConNeg+Pl3: tīʼegõd
    tīedõ+V+Quo+Sg3: tēʼji
    tīedõ+V+Quo+ConNeg+Sg3: tēʼji
    tīedõ+V+Quo+Pl3: tēʼjid
    tīedõ+V+Quo+ConNeg+Pl3: tēʼjid
    tīedõ+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg: tīʼend
    tīedõ+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl: tīʼenõd
    tīedõ+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg: tīʼedõd
    tīedõ+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg: tīʼedõb
    tīedõ+V+Der+Der/NomAg+N+Sg+Nom: tēʼji
    tīedõ+V+Der+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Nom: tīʼemi
    
#"V_7":{"tips":"7","vards":"sīedõ","vcount":"4","bloks":"V","loc":{
    sīedõ+V+Inf: sīedõ
    sīedõ+V+Ger: sīedsõ
    sīedõ+V+Sup: sīemõ
    sīedõ+V+Deb: sīemõst
    sīedõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sīeb
    sīedõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: sīed
    sīedõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sīeb
    sīedõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: sīemõ
    sīedõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: sīetõ
    sīedõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: sīebõd
    sīedõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: sei
    sīedõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: seid
    sīedõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: sei
    sīedõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: seimõ
    sīedõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: seitõ
    sīedõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: seitõ
    sīedõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: sīe
    sīedõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Pl1: sīemõ
    sīedõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Pl2: sīetõ
    sīedõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Pl3: sīetõ
    sīedõ+V+Cond+Sg1: sīeks
    sīedõ+V+Cond+Sg2: sīekst
    sīedõ+V+Cond+Sg3: sīeks
    sīedõ+V+Cond+Pl1: sīeksmõ
    sīedõ+V+Cond+Pl2: sīekstõ
    sīedõ+V+Cond+Pl3: sīekstõ
    sīedõ+V+Cond+ConNeg+Sg: sīeks
    sīedõ+V+Cond+ConNeg+Pl1: sīeksmõ
    sīedõ+V+Cond+ConNeg+Pl2: sīekstõ
    sīedõ+V+Cond+ConNeg+Pl3: sīekstõ
    sīedõ+V+Imprt+Sg2: sīe
    sīedõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: sīe
    sīedõ+V+Imprt+Pl2: sīegid
    sīedõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl2: sīegid
    sīedõ+V+Jus+Sg3: sīegõ
    sīedõ+V+Jus+ConNeg+Sg3: sīegõ
    sīedõ+V+Jus+Pl3: sīegõd
    sīedõ+V+Jus+ConNeg+Pl3: sīegõd
    sīedõ+V+Quo+Sg3: sēji
    sīedõ+V+Quo+ConNeg+Sg3: sēji
    sīedõ+V+Quo+Pl3: sējid
    sīedõ+V+Quo+ConNeg+Pl3: sējid
    sīedõ+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg: sīend
    sīedõ+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl: sīenõd
    sīedõ+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg: sīedõd
    sīedõ+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg: sīedõb
    sīedõ+V+Der+Der/NomAg+N+Sg+Nom: sēji
    sīedõ+V+Der+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Nom: sīemi
    
#"V_8":{"tips":"8","vards":"sǭdõ","vcount":"3","bloks":"V","loc":{
    sōdõ+V+Inf: sǭdõ
    sōdõ+V+Ger: sǭdsõ
    sōdõ+V+Sup: sǭmõ
    sōdõ+V+Deb: sǭmõst
    sōdõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sǭb
    sōdõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: sǭd
    sōdõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sǭb
    sōdõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: sǭmõ
    sōdõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: sǭtõ
    sōdõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: sǭbõd
    sōdõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: sai
    sōdõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: said
    sōdõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: sai
    sōdõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [saimõ, sāima]
    sōdõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [saitõ, sāita]
    sōdõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [saitõ, sāita]
    sōdõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: sǭ
    sōdõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Pl1: sǭmõ
    sōdõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Pl2: sǭtõ
    sōdõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Pl3: sǭtõ
    sōdõ+V+Cond+Sg1: sǭks
    sōdõ+V+Cond+Sg2: sǭkst
    sōdõ+V+Cond+Sg3: sǭks
    sōdõ+V+Cond+Pl1: sǭksmõ
    sōdõ+V+Cond+Pl2: sǭkstõ
    sōdõ+V+Cond+Pl3: sǭkstõ
    sōdõ+V+Cond+ConNeg+Sg: sǭks
    sōdõ+V+Cond+ConNeg+Pl1: sǭksmõ
    sōdõ+V+Cond+ConNeg+Pl2: sǭkstõ
    sōdõ+V+Cond+ConNeg+Pl3: sǭkstõ
    sōdõ+V+Imprt+Sg2: sǭ
    sōdõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: sǭ
    sōdõ+V+Imprt+Pl2: sǭgid
    sōdõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl2: sǭgid
    sōdõ+V+Jus+Sg3: sǭgõ
    sōdõ+V+Jus+ConNeg+Sg3: sǭgõ
    sōdõ+V+Jus+Pl3: sǭgõd
    sōdõ+V+Jus+ConNeg+Pl3: sǭgõd
    sōdõ+V+Quo+Sg3: sǭji
    sōdõ+V+Quo+ConNeg+Sg3: sǭji
    sōdõ+V+Quo+Pl3: sǭjid
    sōdõ+V+Quo+ConNeg+Pl3: sǭjid
    sōdõ+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg: sǭnd
    sōdõ+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl: sǭnõd
    sōdõ+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg: sǭdõd
    sōdõ+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg: sǭdõb
    sōdõ+V+Der+Der/NomAg+N+Sg+Nom: sǭji
    sōdõ+V+Der+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Nom: sǭmi
    
#"V_9":{"tips":"9","vards":"jūodõ","vcount":"3","bloks":"V","loc":{
    jūodõ+Hom1+V+Inf: jūodõ
    jūodõ+Hom1+V+Ger: jūodsõ
    jūodõ+Hom1+V+Sup: jūomõ
    jūodõ+Hom1+V+Deb: jūomõst
    jūodõ+Hom1+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: jūob
    jūodõ+Hom1+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: jūod
    jūodõ+Hom1+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: jūob
    jūodõ+Hom1+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: jūomõ
    jūodõ+Hom1+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: jūotõ
    jūodõ+Hom1+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: jūobõd
    jūodõ+Hom1+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: juoi
    jūodõ+Hom1+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: juoid
    jūodõ+Hom1+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: juoi
    jūodõ+Hom1+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: juoimõ
    jūodõ+Hom1+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: juoitõ
    jūodõ+Hom1+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: juoitõ
    jūodõ+Hom1+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: jūo
    jūodõ+Hom1+V+Ind+ConNeg+Pl1: jūomõ
    jūodõ+Hom1+V+Ind+ConNeg+Pl2: jūotõ
    jūodõ+Hom1+V+Ind+ConNeg+Pl3: jūotõ
    jūodõ+Hom1+V+Cond+Sg1: jūoks
    jūodõ+Hom1+V+Cond+Sg2: jūokst
